Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.190.010

Educational program for juveniles in detention facilities.

A program of education shall be provided for by the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families and the several school districts of the state for common school-age persons who have been admitted to facilities staffed and maintained or contracted pursuant to RCW 13.40.320 by the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families for the education and treatment of juveniles who have been diverted or who have been found to have committed a juvenile offense. The division of duties, authority, and liabilities of the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families and the several school districts of the state respecting the educational programs shall be the same in all respects as set forth in this chapter respecting programs of education for state residential school residents. For the purposes of this section, the term "residential school" or "schools" as used in this chapter shall be construed to mean a facility staffed and maintained by the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families or a program established under RCW 13.40.320, for the education and treatment of juvenile offenders on probation or parole. Nothing in this section shall prohibit a school district from utilizing the services of an educational service district subject to RCW 28A.310.180.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 720; 2014 c 157 s 2; 1996 c 84 s 1; 1990 c 33 s 170; 1983 c 98 s 3. Formerly RCW 28A.58.765.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 ss 601-631, 701-728, and 804: See note following RCW 13.04.011.

Conflict with federal requirements—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6: See RCW 43.216.908.

Juvenile facilities, educational programs: RCW 13.04.145.